District of Columbia statutes.
Repealed

29A-201.16

Purchase of stock of other corporations unlawful.

Repealed.

Mar. 3, 1901, 31 Stat. 1286, ch. 854, § 620
Mar. 14, 1952, 66 Stat. 24, ch. 103, § 1
July 2, 2011, D.C. Law 18-378, § 3(k)(1), 58 DCR 1720

History

2001 Ed., § 29-201.16.
1981 Ed., § 29-216.
1973 Ed., § 29-216.

Prior Codifications